Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2321
Nurse practitioner; right to use title or abbreviation.

A person licensed to practice as a nurse practitioner in this state may use the title nurse practitioner and the abbreviation NP.

Laws 1984, LB 724, § 27;

Laws 1996, LB 414, § 32;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 48;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 61;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1723.01;

Laws 2007, LB185, § 8;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 813.